Hawaii statutes.
§132-10 Witnesses; fees. The county
fire appeals board or the county fire chief shall in all proceedings have the
same powers respecting administering oaths, compelling the attendance of
witnesses and the production of documentary evidence, and examining witnesses
as are possessed by circuit courts. In case of disobedience by any person of
any order of the county fire appeals board or the county fire chief or of any
subpoena issued by either of them or of the refusal of any witness to testify
to any matter regarding which the witness may be questioned lawfully, any
circuit judge, on application by the county corporation counsel, shall compel
obedience as in case of disobedience of all requirements of a subpoena issued
from a circuit court or a refusal to testify therein. The fees and traveling
expenses of witnesses shall be the same as are allowed witnesses in the circuit
courts and shall be paid by the appropriate county out of any appropriation or
funds available for the expenses of the county fire chief. [L 1917, c 115, pt
of §49; RL 1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(19);
RL 1945, §8535; RL 1955, §184-12; HRS §132-12; am L 1973, c 31, pt of §21; am
and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(13); gen ch 1985]

Rules of Court

Subpoena, see HRCP
rule 45.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next